Illinois, session 104th, SB1841.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 31 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/31)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1031)7    Sec. 31. Notice; complaint; hearing. 8    (a)(1) Within 180 days after becoming aware of an alleged 9violation of this Act, any rule adopted under this Act, a 10permit granted by the Agency, or a condition of such a permit, 11the Agency shall issue and serve, by certified mail, upon the 12person complained against a written notice informing that 13person that the Agency has evidence of the alleged violation. 14At a minimum, the written notice shall contain:15        (A) a notification to the person complained against of 16    the requirement to submit a written response addressing 17    the violations alleged and the option to meet with 18    appropriate agency personnel to resolve any alleged 19    violations that could lead to the filing of a formal 20    complaint;21        (B) a detailed explanation by the Agency of the 22    violations alleged;23        (C) an explanation by the Agency of the actions that   SB1841- 2 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1    the Agency believes may resolve the alleged violations, 2    including an estimate of a reasonable time period for the 3    person complained against to complete the suggested 4    resolution; and5        (D) an explanation of any alleged violation that the 6    Agency believes cannot be resolved without the involvement 7    of the Office of the Illinois Attorney General or the 8    State's Attorney of the county in which the alleged 9    violation occurred and the basis for the Agency's belief. 10    (2) A written response to the violations alleged shall be 11submitted to the Agency, by certified mail, within 45 days 12after receipt of notice by the person complained against, or 13within an extended time period as agreed to by the Agency and 14person complained against. The written response shall include:15        (A) information in rebuttal, explanation, or 16    justification of each alleged violation;17        (B) if the person complained against desires to enter 18    into a Compliance Commitment Agreement, proposed terms for 19    a Compliance Commitment Agreement that includes specified 20    times for achieving each commitment and which may consist 21    of a statement indicating that the person complained 22    against believes that compliance has been achieved; and23        (C) a request for a meeting with appropriate Agency 24    personnel if a meeting is desired by the person complained 25    against. 26    (3) If the person complained against fails to respond in   SB1841- 3 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1accordance with the requirements of subdivision (2) of this 2subsection (a), the failure to respond shall be considered a 3waiver of the requirements of this subsection (a) and nothing 4in this Section shall preclude the Agency from proceeding 5pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section. 6    (4) A meeting requested pursuant to subdivision (2) of 7this subsection (a) shall be held without a representative of 8the Office of the Illinois Attorney General or the State's 9Attorney of the county in which the alleged violation 10occurred, within 60 days after receipt of notice by the person 11complained against, or within an extended time period as 12agreed to by the Agency and person complained against. At the 13meeting, the Agency shall provide an opportunity for the 14person complained against to respond to each alleged 15violation, suggested resolution, and suggested implementation 16time frame, and to suggest alternate resolutions. 17    (5) If a meeting requested pursuant to subdivision (2) of 18this subsection (a) is held, the person complained against 19shall, within 21 days following the meeting or within an 20extended time period as agreed to by the Agency and person 21complained against, submit by certified mail to the Agency a 22written response to the alleged violations. The written 23response shall include:24        (A) additional information in rebuttal, explanation, 25    or justification of each alleged violation;26        (B) if the person complained against desires to enter   SB1841- 4 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1    into a Compliance Commitment Agreement, proposed terms for 2    a Compliance Commitment Agreement that includes specified 3    times for achieving each commitment and which may consist 4    of a statement indicating that the person complained 5    against believes that compliance has been achieved; and6        (C) a statement indicating that, should the person 7    complained against so wish, the person complained against 8    chooses to rely upon the initial written response 9    submitted pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection 10    (a). 11    (6) If the person complained against fails to respond in 12accordance with the requirements of subdivision (5) of this 13subsection (a), the failure to respond shall be considered a 14waiver of the requirements of this subsection (a) and nothing 15in this Section shall preclude the Agency from proceeding 16pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section. 17    (7) Within 30 days after the Agency's receipt of a written 18response submitted by the person complained against pursuant 19to subdivision (2) of this subsection (a) if a meeting is not 20requested or pursuant to subdivision (5) of this subsection 21(a) if a meeting is held, or within a later time period as 22agreed to by the Agency and the person complained against, the 23Agency shall issue and serve, by certified mail, upon the 24person complained against (i) a proposed Compliance Commitment 25Agreement or (ii) a notice that one or more violations cannot 26be resolved without the involvement of the Office of the   SB1841- 5 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in 2which the alleged violation occurred and that no proposed 3Compliance Commitment Agreement will be issued by the Agency 4for those violations. The Agency shall include terms and 5conditions in the proposed Compliance Commitment Agreement 6that are, in its discretion, necessary to bring the person 7complained against into compliance with the Act, any rule 8adopted under the Act, any permit granted by the Agency, or any 9condition of such a permit. The Agency shall take into 10consideration the proposed terms for the proposed Compliance 11Commitment Agreement that were provided under subdivision 12(a)(2)(B) or (a)(5)(B) of this Section by the person 13complained against.14    (7.5) Within 30 days after the receipt of the Agency's 15proposed Compliance Commitment Agreement by the person 16complained against, or within a later time period not to 17exceed an additional 30 days as agreed to by the Agency and the 18person complained against, the person shall either (i) agree 19to and sign the proposed Compliance Commitment Agreement 20provided by the Agency and submit the signed Compliance 21Commitment Agreement to the Agency by certified mail or (ii) 22notify the Agency in writing by certified mail of the person's 23rejection of the proposed Compliance Commitment Agreement. If 24the person complained against fails to respond to the proposed 25Compliance Commitment Agreement within 30 days as required 26under this paragraph, the proposed Compliance Commitment   SB1841- 6 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1Agreement is deemed rejected by operation of law. Any 2Compliance Commitment Agreement entered into under item (i) of 3this paragraph may be amended subsequently in writing by 4mutual agreement between the Agency and the signatory to the 5Compliance Commitment Agreement, the signatory's legal 6representative, or the signatory's agent.7    (7.6) No person shall violate the terms or conditions of a 8Compliance Commitment Agreement entered into under subdivision 9(a)(7.5) of this Section. Successful completion of a 10Compliance Commitment Agreement or an amended Compliance 11Commitment Agreement shall be a factor to be weighed, in favor 12of the person completing the Agreement, by the Office of the 13Illinois Attorney General in determining whether to file a 14complaint for the violations that were the subject of the 15Agreement. 16    (7.7) Within 30 days after a Compliance Commitment 17Agreement takes effect or is amended in accordance with 18paragraph (7.5), the Agency shall publish a copy of the final 19executed Compliance Commitment Agreement on the Agency's 20website. The Agency shall maintain an Internet database of all 21Compliance Commitment Agreements entered on or after August 2224, 2018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1080). At a 23minimum, the database shall be searchable by the following 24categories: the county in which the facility that is subject 25to the Compliance Commitment Agreement is located; the date of 26final execution of the Compliance Commitment Agreement; the   SB1841- 7 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1name of the respondent; and the media involved, including air, 2water, land, or public water supply. 3    (8) Nothing in this subsection (a) is intended to require 4the Agency to enter into Compliance Commitment Agreements for 5any alleged violation that the Agency believes cannot be 6resolved without the involvement of the Office of the Attorney 7General or the State's Attorney of the county in which the 8alleged violation occurred, for, among other purposes, the 9imposition of statutory penalties. 10    (9) The Agency's failure to respond within 30 days of 11receipt to a written response submitted pursuant to 12subdivision (2) of this subsection (a) if a meeting is not 13requested or pursuant to subdivision (5) of this subsection 14(a) if a meeting is held, or within the time period otherwise 15agreed to in writing by the Agency and the person complained 16against, shall be deemed an acceptance by the Agency of the 17proposed terms of the Compliance Commitment Agreement for the 18violations alleged in the written notice issued under 19subdivision (1) of this subsection (a) as contained within the 20written response. 21    (10) If the person complained against complies with the 22terms of a Compliance Commitment Agreement accepted pursuant 23to this subsection (a), the Agency shall not refer the alleged 24violations which are the subject of the Compliance Commitment 25Agreement to the Office of the Illinois Attorney General or 26the State's Attorney of the county in which the alleged   SB1841- 8 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1violation occurred. However, nothing in this subsection is 2intended to preclude the Agency from continuing negotiations 3with the person complained against or from proceeding pursuant 4to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Section for 5alleged violations that remain the subject of disagreement 6between the Agency and the person complained against following 7fulfillment of the requirements of this subsection (a). 8    (11) Nothing in this subsection (a) is intended to 9preclude the person complained against from submitting to the 10Agency, by certified mail, at any time, notification that the 11person complained against consents to waiver of the 12requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.13    (12) The Agency shall have the authority to adopt rules 14for the administration of this subsection (a). The rules shall 15be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Illinois 16Administrative Procedure Act. 17    (b) For alleged violations that remain the subject of 18disagreement between the Agency and the person complained 19against following fulfillment of the requirements of 20subsection (a) of this Section, and for alleged violations of 21the terms or conditions of a Compliance Commitment Agreement 22entered into under subdivision (a)(7.5) of this Section as 23well as the alleged violations that are the subject of the 24Compliance Commitment Agreement, and as a precondition to the 25Agency's referral or request to the Office of the Illinois 26Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in   SB1841- 9 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1which the alleged violation occurred for legal representation 2regarding an alleged violation that may be addressed pursuant 3to subsection (c) or (d) of this Section or pursuant to Section 442 of this Act, the Agency shall issue and serve, by certified 5mail, upon the person complained against a written notice 6informing that person that the Agency intends to pursue legal 7action. Such notice shall notify the person complained against 8of the violations to be alleged and offer the person an 9opportunity to meet with appropriate Agency personnel in an 10effort to resolve any alleged violations that could lead to 11the filing of a formal complaint. The meeting with Agency 12personnel shall be held within 30 days after receipt of notice 13served pursuant to this subsection upon the person complained 14against, unless the Agency agrees to a postponement or the 15person notifies the Agency that he or she will not appear at a 16meeting within the 30-day time period. Nothing in this 17subsection is intended to preclude the Agency from following 18the provisions of subsection (c) or (d) of this Section or from 19requesting the legal representation of the Office of the 20Illinois Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the 21county in which the alleged violations occurred for alleged 22violations which remain the subject of disagreement between 23the Agency and the person complained against after the 24provisions of this subsection are fulfilled. 25    (c)(1) For alleged violations which remain the subject of 26disagreement between the Agency and the person complained   SB1841- 10 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1against following waiver pursuant to subdivision (10) of 2subsection (a) of this Section or fulfillment of the 3requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this Section, the 4Office of the Illinois Attorney General or the State's 5Attorney of the county in which the alleged violation occurred 6shall issue and serve upon the person complained against a 7written notice, together with a formal complaint, which shall 8specify the provision of the Act, rule, regulation, permit, or 9term or condition thereof under which such person is said to be 10in violation and a statement of the manner in and the extent to 11which such person is said to violate the Act, rule, 12regulation, permit, or term or condition thereof and shall 13require the person so complained against to answer the charges 14of such formal complaint at a hearing before the Board at a 15time not less than 21 days after the date of notice by the 16Board, except as provided in Section 34 of this Act and unless 17the person so complained against has made a reasonable effort 18to remedy the violation, as determined by the Agency. Such 19complaint shall be accompanied by a notification to the 20defendant that financing may be available, through the 21Illinois Environmental Facilities Financing Act, to correct 22such violation. A copy of such notice of such hearings shall 23also be sent to any person who has complained to the Agency 24respecting the respondent within the six months preceding the 25date of the complaint, and to any person in the county in which 26the offending activity occurred that has requested notice of   SB1841- 11 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1enforcement proceedings; 21 days notice of such hearings shall 2also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in 3such county. The respondent may file a written answer, and at 4such hearing the rules prescribed in Sections 32 and 33 of this 5Act shall apply. In the case of actual or threatened acts 6outside Illinois contributing to environmental damage in 7Illinois, the extraterritorial service-of-process provisions 8of Sections 2-208 and 2-209 of the Code of Civil Procedure 9shall apply. 10    Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the contrary, 11any violation or alleged violation from January 1, 2023, until 12January 1, 2024, brought by the Office of the Attorney General 13shall be reviewed within 30 days of the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly for compliance 15with the changes to this paragraph made by this amendatory Act 16of the 104th General Assembly if the violation occurred in a 17municipality with a population larger than 900, but smaller 18than 1,100. 19    With respect to notices served pursuant to this subsection 20(c)(1) that involve hazardous material or wastes in any 21manner, the Agency shall annually publish a list of all such 22notices served. The list shall include the date the 23investigation commenced, the date notice was sent, the date 24the matter was referred to the Attorney General, if 25applicable, and the current status of the matter. 26    (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of   SB1841- 12 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1this subsection (c), whenever a complaint has been filed on 2behalf of the Agency or by the People of the State of Illinois, 3the parties may file with the Board a stipulation and proposal 4for settlement accompanied by a request for relief from the 5requirement of a hearing pursuant to subdivision (1). Unless 6the Board, in its discretion, concludes that a hearing will be 7held, the Board shall cause notice of the stipulation, 8proposal and request for relief to be published and sent in the 9same manner as is required for hearing pursuant to subdivision 10(1) of this subsection. The notice shall include a statement 11that any person may file a written demand for hearing within 21 12days after receiving the notice. If any person files a timely 13written demand for hearing, the Board shall deny the request 14for relief from a hearing and shall hold a hearing in 15accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1). 16    (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of 17this subsection (c), if the Agency becomes aware of a 18violation of this Act arising from, or as a result of, 19voluntary pollution prevention activities, the Agency shall 20not proceed with the written notice required by subsection (a) 21of this Section unless:22        (A) the person fails to take corrective action or 23    eliminate the reported violation within a reasonable time; 24    or25        (B) the Agency believes that the violation poses a 26    substantial and imminent danger to the public health or   SB1841- 13 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1    welfare or the environment. For the purposes of this item 2    (B), "substantial and imminent danger" means a danger with 3    a likelihood of serious or irreversible harm. 4    (d)(1) Any person may file with the Board a complaint, 5meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this Section, 6against any person allegedly violating this Act, any rule or 7regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 8condition of a permit, or any Board order. The complainant 9shall immediately serve a copy of such complaint upon the 10person or persons named therein. Unless the Board determines 11that such complaint is duplicative or frivolous, it shall 12schedule a hearing and serve written notice thereof upon the 13person or persons named therein, in accord with subsection (c) 14of this Section. 15    (2) Whenever a complaint has been filed by a person other 16than the Attorney General or the State's Attorney, the parties 17may file with the Board a stipulation and proposal for 18settlement accompanied by a request for relief from the 19hearing requirement of subdivision (c)(1) of this Section. 20Unless the Board, in its discretion, concludes that a hearing 21should be held, no hearing on the stipulation and proposal for 22settlement is required.23    (e) In hearings before the Board under this Title the 24burden shall be on the Agency or other complainant to show 25either that the respondent has caused or threatened to cause 26air or water pollution or that the respondent has violated or   SB1841- 14 -LRB104 10648 BDA 20725 b1threatens to violate any provision of this Act or any rule or 2regulation of the Board or permit or term or condition 3thereof. If such proof has been made, the burden shall be on 4the respondent to show that compliance with the Board's 5regulations would impose an arbitrary or unreasonable 6hardship.7    (f) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to 8administrative citation actions commenced under Section 31.1 9of this Act.10(Source: P.A. 103-168, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.